Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4615
Network pharmacy or network pharmacist; decline to provide a drug; when; duties; effect.

(1) A network pharmacy or network pharmacist may decline to provide a drug if the pharmacy or pharmacist will be or is paid less than the acquisition cost for the drug.

(2) If a network pharmacy or network pharmacist declines to provide a drug as authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the pharmacy or pharmacist shall provide the covered person with adequate information as to where the prescription for the drug may be filled or shall refer the covered person to his or her plan sponsor.

(3) A pharmacy benefit manager, pharmacy services administrative organization, or any person acting on behalf of a pharmacy benefit manager or pharmacy services administrative organization shall not penalize, remove from the network, or otherwise retaliate against a network pharmacy or network pharmacist solely for declining to provide a drug as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 2025, LB198, § 6.